Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2485.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1306.3-B. Trauma-informed records program.(a) Trauma-informed records program establishment and records maintenance.--A school entity that participates in the School Safety and Security Grant Program established under section 1306-B may establish a trauma-informed records program. If a school entity opts to establish a trauma-informed records program, the school entity shall maintain electronic records, overseen by a mental health professional, in a format developed 1234567891011121314151617181920 by the department that includes information relating to traumatic events and adverse childhood experiences of a student, including:(1) Information provided by a county or law enforcement agency regarding a student.(2) Information provided by a family-authorized medical provider regarding a student.(3) Information concerning in-school incidents regarding a student that would prompt a call to a law enforcement agency, behavioral health unit, mobile crisis unit, school safety program or student support service such as a student assistance program as defined in 22 Pa. Code § 12.16 (relating to definitions).(4) Information provided by a behavioral health unit, a mobile crisis unit, a school safety program or a student support service such as a student assistance program as defined in 22 Pa. Code § 12.16.(5) A statement written by the school's certified school counselor concerning the overall well-being of the student that excludes confidential information.(6) A summary of known triggers for the student that induce symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder relating to previous exposure to trauma that excludes confidential information provided by a behavioral health unit, mobile crisis unit, school safety program, student support service or family-authorized medical provider.(7) A support plan detailing how a school entity will care for the student regarding the history of exposure to trauma and overall well-being of the student. The department shall enforce the inclusion of a support plan by a school 20260HB2485PN3357 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity that opts to establish a trauma-informed records program.(8) Any information voluntarily given by a parent or guardian concerning a student.(b) Administrator.--In the event a school entity does not have a mental health professional employed, a school board may select a currently employed school administrator to oversee the trauma-informed records. A school administrator selected by the school board shall undergo educational training relating to trauma-informed approaches as outlined under section 1205.7, as well as training relating to record management.(c) Tiers of information.--The department, in developing an electronic format for trauma-informed records, shall classify information into the following three tiers:(1) Tier one shall include all aspects of a student's trauma-informed record, as well as the contact information of any outside agency that has provided information to a school entity concerning a traumatic event of a student.(2) Tier two shall only include a summary of traumatic events with a list of known triggers for a student that induce post-traumatic stress disorder symptoms relating to previous exposure to trauma. The summary shall include the support plan for the student in place by the school entity and exclude confidential information.(3) Tier three shall only include a brief statement concerning the overall well-being of a student.(d) Use.--Information maintained in trauma-informed records shall be utilized exclusively for usage purposes such as assisting:(1) A school entity in developing a trauma-informed 20260HB2485PN3357 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 approach to support the student population.(2) A school entity in developing instructional approaches under section 1205.7.(3) School officials as a part of the determination process of in-school supports needed for a student.(e) Restrictions on use.--Information maintained in a trauma-informed record shall not be:(1) used for determining whether or not a student is admitted to a school, extracurricular activity or institute of higher education; or(2) subject to subpoena for a criminal matter or permitted to be used in a juvenile criminal justice matter.(f) Confidentiality.--A student's trauma-informed record shall be confidential and the record content may only be divulged if considered appropriate by the mental health professional or the school administrator responsible for the maintenance of the record and with parental agreement in some instances. The following authorities shall have access to request information within the records:(1) The parent or guardian of a student for which the school entity has maintained a record.(2) School officials and professional employees. All school officials or professional employees must have written authorization by the certified school counselor or the school administrator responsible for the maintenance of the records in order to view a student's trauma-informed record. The written authorization shall outline to which tier under subsection (c) a school official or professional employee has access. A school official or professional employee must request access to a student's record each time access to the 20260HB2485PN3357 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 record is required.(3) A family-authorized medical provider. All family-authorized medical providers must have written authorization by the student's parent or guardian in order to view a student's record.(4) Cooperating county or law enforcement agencies. All cooperating county and law enforcement agencies must have written authorization by the student's parent or guardian in order to view a student's record.(5) The student for which a record has been maintained.(g) Transfer.--When a student transfers to another grant-funded school entity or grant-funded nonpublic school under this article, a certified copy of the student's trauma-informed record shall be transmitted to the school entity or nonpublic school to which the student has transferred. The school entity or nonpublic school to which the student has transferred shall request the record. The sending school entity or nonpublic school shall have 10 days from receipt of the request to supply a certified copy of the student's record. The transfer of the record shall be administered by the school counselors or school administrator selected by the school boards of the respective school entities or nonpublic schools.(h) Retention.--If a school entity no longer receives grant funding under this article or if a student no longer attends the school entity, the school entity shall retain trauma-informed records for no longer than two years after the discontinuation of funding or disenrollment of the student. A school entity shall destroy all trauma-informed records maintained by a school entity in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department two years after the discontinuation of funding or 20260HB2485PN3357 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disenrollment of the student.(i) Record establishment.--A parent or guardian of a student shall be notified of a trauma-informed record being established for that student and shall either approve or reject the creation of a trauma-informed record.(j) Penalty.--Any individual who discloses a record deemed confidential under this section, unless the individual is authorized by this section, commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(k) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Post-traumatic stress disorder." As defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, 5th Edition: DSM-5, 2013, published by the American Psychiatric Association."Support plan." A detailed written document that specifies the support services that are to be developed and provided to the student, including information on the following:(1) Services provided to the student.(2) When the services shall be provided to the student.(3) Manner in which services shall meet the needs of the student.(4) Individual providing services to the student."Trauma." The term includes results from an event, series of events or set of circumstances that is experienced by an individual as physically or emotionally harmful or threatening and that has lasting adverse effects on the individual's cognitive functioning and physical, social, emotional, mental or spiritual well-being.20260HB2485PN3357 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Trauma-informed approach." Includes a school-wide approach to education and a classroom-based approach to student learning that recognizes the signs and symptoms of trauma and responds by fully integrating knowledge about trauma into policies, professional learning, procedures and practices for the purposes of recognizing the presence and onset of trauma, resisting the reoccurrence of trauma and promoting resiliency tailored to a school entity's culture, climate and demographics and the community as a whole."Trauma-informed record." A record of traumatic events as established under this section."Traumatic event." The term includes an event or series of events that causes physical, emotional or psychological harm and has lasting adverse effects on the individual's cognitive functioning and physical, social, emotional, mental or spiritual well-being.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2485PN3357 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617